suomimalaga/vvfst/poikkeavat-sukija.lexc
LEXICON SukijaPoikkeavat_ep
[Lep][Xp]Fär=saari[X]fäär[Bm]saar@P.EI_YKS.ON@:fäärsaar@P.EI_YKS.ON@ PaikannimiTuohi_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sn][Ny]iso[Bm]kylä:isokylä	PaikannimiNormaaliYsJatkoOl_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sg][Ny]ison[Bm]kylän:isonkylän	PaikannimiYksikönGenetiivinJatko_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sp][Ny]isoa[Bm]kylää:isoakylää	PaikannimiLiOlV_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Ses][Ny]isona[Bm]kylänä:isonakylänä	PaikannimiLiOlV_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Str][Ny]isoksi[Bm]kyläksi:isoksikyläksi	PaikannimiLiOlI_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sine][Ny]isossa[Bm]kylässä:isossakylässä	PaikannimiLiOlV_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sela][Ny]isosta[Bm]kylästä:isostakylästä	PaikannimiLiOlV_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sill][Ny]isoon[Bm]kylää:isoonkylää	PaikannimiLiOlN_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sill][Ny]isoon[Bm]kylähä:isoonkylähän	PaikannimiLiOlN_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sade][Ny]isolla[Bm]kylällä:isollakylällä	PaikannimiLiOlV_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sabl][Ny]isolta[Bm]kylältä:isoltakylältä	PaikannimiLiOlV_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sall][Ny]isolle[Bm]kylälle:isollekylälle	PaikannimiLiOlV_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sab][Ny]isotta[Bm]kylättä:isottakylättä	PaikannimiLiOlV_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sn][Ny]iso[Bm]suo:isosuo	PaikannimiNormaaliYsJatkoOl_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sg][Ny]ison[Bm]suon:isonsuon	PaikannimiYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sp][Ny]isoa[Bm]suota:isoasuota	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Ses][Ny]isona[Bm]suona:isonasuona	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Str][Ny]isoksi[Bm]suoksi:isoksisuoksi	PaikannimiLiOlI_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sine][Ny]isossa[Bm]suossa:isossasuossa	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sela][Ny]isosta[Bm]suosta:isostasuosta	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sill][Ny]isoon[Bm]suoho:isoonsuoho		PaikannimiLiOlN_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sade][Ny]isolla[Bm]suolla:isollasuolla	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sabl][Ny]isolta[Bm]suolta:isoltasuolta	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sall][Ny]isolle[Bm]suolle:isollesuolle	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sab][Ny]isotta[Bm]suotta:isottasuotta	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X]iso[Bm]suo:isosuo	Johdin_lAinen_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sn][Ny]iso[Bm]talo:isotalo	PaikannimiNormaaliYsJatkoOl_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sg][Ny]ison[Bm]talon:isontalon	PaikannimiYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sp][Ny]isoa[Bm]taloa:isoataloa	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Ses][Ny]isona[Bm]talona:isonatalona	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Str][Ny]isoksi[Bm]taloksi:isoksitaloksi	PaikannimiLiOlI_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sine][Ny]isossa[Bm]talossa:isossatalossa	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sela][Ny]isosta[Bm]talosta:isostatalosta	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sill][Ny]isoon[Bm]taloo:isoontaloo		PaikannimiLiOlN_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sade][Ny]isolla[Bm]talolla:isollatalolla	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sabl][Ny]isolta[Bm]talolta:isoltatalolta	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sall][Ny]isolle[Bm]talolle:isolletalolle	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sab][Ny]isotta[Bm]talotta:isottatalotta	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X]iso[Bm]talo:isotalo	Johdin_lAinen_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sn][Ny]kaunis[Bm]portti:kaunisportti       PaikannimiNormaaliYsJatkoOl_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sg][Ny]kauniin[Bm]portti:kauniinportti     Omistusliite_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sg][Ny]kauniin[Bm]portin:kauniinportin     PaikannimiYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sp][Ny]kaunista[Bm]porttia:kaunistaporttia       PaikannimiLiOlV_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Ses][Ny]kauniina[Bm]porttina:kauniinaporttina    PaikannimiLiOlV_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Str][Ny]kauniiksi[Bm]portiksi:kauniiksiportiksi  PaikannimiLiOlI_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sine][Ny]kauniissa[Bm]portissa:kauniissaportissa PaikannimiLiOlV_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sela][Ny]kauniista[Bm]portista:kauniistaportista PaikannimiLiOlV_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sill][Ny]kauniiseen[Bm]porttii:kauniiseenporttii PaikannimiLiOlN_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sade][Ny]kauniilla[Bm]portilla:kauniillaportilla PaikannimiLiOlV_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sabl][Ny]kauniilta[Bm]portilta:kauniiltaportilta PaikannimiLiOlV_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sall][Ny]kauniille[Bm]portille:kauniilleportille PaikannimiLiOlV_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sab][Ny]kauniitta[Bm]portitta:kauniittaportitta  PaikannimiLiOlV_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sn][Ny]vanha[Bm]kirkko:vanhakirkko	PaikannimiNormaaliYsJatkoOl_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sg][Ny]vanhan[Bm]kirkko:vanhankirkko	Omistusliite_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sg][Ny]vanhan[Bm]kirkon:vanhankirkon	PaikannimiYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sp][Ny]vanhaa[Bm]kirkkoa:vanhaakirkkoa  	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Ses][Ny]vanhana[Bm]kirkkona:vanhanakirkkona	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Str][Ny]vanhaksi[Bm]kirkoksi:vanhaksikirkoksi	PaikannimiLiOlI_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sine][Ny]vanhassa[Bm]kirkossa:vanhassakirkossa	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sela][Ny]vanhasta[Bm]kirkosta:vanhastakirkosta	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sill][Ny]vanhaan[Bm]kirkkoo:vanhaankirkkoo	PaikannimiLiOlN_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sade][Ny]vanhalla[Bm]kirkolla:vanhallakirkolla	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sabl][Ny]vanhalta[Bm]kirkolta:vanhaltakirkolta	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sall][Ny]vanhalle[Bm]kirkolle:vanhallekirkolle	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sab][Ny]vanhatta[Bm]kirkotta:vanhattakirkotta	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X]vanha[Bm]kirkko:vanhakirkko Johdin_lAinen_a ;

LEXICON SukijaPoikkeavat_l
[Ll][Xp]aikainen[X]aikahi:aikahi  LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]esimuistoinen[X]esi[Bm]muistoi:esimuistoi  LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]esivalintainen[X]esi[Bm]valintai:esivalintai  LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]etäkäyttöinen[X]etä[Bm]käyttöi:etäkäyttöi     LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]jonkinlainen[X]jonkil[Bm]lai:jonkillai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]jonkunlainen[X]jonkul[Bm]lai:jonkullai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kaukokäyttöinen[X]kauko[Bm]käyttöi:kaukokäyttöi     LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]kiiru[X]kiiru:kiiru Yliaste_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kiiruinen[X]kiiruhui:kiiruhui LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kiiruinen[X]kiirui:kiirui LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kiiruisa[X]kiiruis:kiiruis LaatusanaKoira_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kiirumpi[X]kiiru:kiiru NimiLaatusanaSuurempi_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kiirumpi[X]kiiruu:kiiruu NimiLaatusanaSuurempi_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kiirunalainen[X]kiirun[Bm]alai:kiirunalai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]kultainen[X]kullai:kullai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]muistiin=painuva[X]muistiin[Bm]painuv:muistiinpainuv LaatusanaAsema_a ;
[Ll][Xp]monenlainen[X]monel[Bm]lai:monellai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]oktaaninen[X]oktani:oktani LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]pieni[X]pien:pien LaatusanaSukijaPieni_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]peilityyni[X]peili[Bm]tyyn:peilityyn LaatusanaSukijaPieni_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]rasvatyyni[X]rasva[Bm]tyyn:rasvatyyn LaatusanaSukijaPieni_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]senkaltainen[X]sen[Bm]kallai:senkallai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]senlainen[X]senkin[Bm]lai:senkinlai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]sisäkäyttöinen[X]sisä[Bm]käyttöi:sisäkäyttöi     LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]sisäviistoinen[X]sisä[Bm]viistoi:sisäviistoi     LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]toisenlainen[X]toisel[Bm]lai:toisellai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]tuollainen[X]tollai:tollai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]tyyni[X]tyyn:tyyn LaatusanaSukijaPieni_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]yhdenlainen[X]yhdellai:yhdellai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]epähuomaavainen[X]epä[Bm]huomaavai:epähuomaavai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]epäluottavainen[X]epä[Bm]luottavai:epäluottavai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]epäonnistuvainen[X]epä[Bm]onnistuvai:epäonnistuvai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]epätyytyväinen[X]epä[Bm]tyytyväi:epätyytyväi LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]epäuskovainen[X]epä[Bm]uskovai:epäuskovai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]epäyhteneväinen [X]epä[Bm]yhteneväi:epäyhteneväi LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]keltavalkoinen[X]kelta[Bm]valkoi:keltavalkoi LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]keltavartinen[X]kelta[Bm]varti:keltavarti LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]keltaverinen[X]kelta[Bm]veri:keltaveri LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]omakutoinen[X]oma[Bm]kutoi:omakutoi LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]omarahoitteinen[X]oma[Bm]rahoittei:omarahoittei LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]omarakenteinen[X]oma[Bm]rakentei:omarakentei LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]peräänantavainen[X]perään[Bm]antavai:peräänantavai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]päälletunkevainen[X]päälle[Bm]tunkevai:päälletunkevai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]sinikeltavalkoinen[X]sini[Bm]kelta[Bm]valkoi:sinikeltavalkoi LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]tosikristillinen[X]tosi[Bm]kristilli:tosikristilli LaatusanaNainenInen_ä ;
[Ll][Xp]yksi=toikkoinen[X]yks[Bm]toikkoi:ykstoikkoi LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]ylitsevuotavainen[X]ylitse[Bm]vuotavai:ylitsevuotavai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Ll][Xp]ylösrakentavainen[X]ylös[Bm]rakentavai:ylösrakentavai LaatusanaNainenInen_a ;

LEXICON SukijaPoikkeavat_nl
[Lnl][Xp]ranskalainen[X]franska[Bm]lai:franskalai  NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]juoni[X]juon:juon NimiLaatusanaSukijaPieni_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]kaikenlainen[X]kaikel[Bm]lai:kaikellai NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]läsnäasuvainen[X]läsnä[Bm]asuvai:läsnäasuvai NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]läsnäolevainen[X]läsnä[Bm]olevai:läsnäolevai NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]roomalainen[X]roma[Bm]lai:romalai      NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;
[Lnl][Xp]suurenmoinen[X]suurem[Bm]moi:suuremmoi NimiLaatusanaNainenInen_a ;


LEXICON SukijaPoikkeavat_t
[Lt][Xp]olla[X]lien:lien Ehtotapa_ä ;
[Lt][Xp]tuta[X]tu:tu SukijaTuta ;
[Lt][Xp]ei[X]ällös:ällös     Loppu ;
[Lt][Xp]ei[X]ällöspä:ällöspä Loppu ;
[Lt][Xp]kitistä[X]kit:kit Kihajaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]lätistä[X]lät:lät Kihajaa_ä ;
[Lt][Xp]nitistä[X]nit:nit Kihajaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]pakista[X]pak:pak Kihajaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]pamista[X]pam:pam Kihajaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]ratista[X]rat:rat Kihajaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]ritistä[X]rit:rit Kihajaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]vapista[X]vap:vap Kihajaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]muistiin=kirjata[X]muistiin[Bm]kirj:muistiinkirj Salata_a ;
!!! [Lt][Xp]muistiin=kirjoittaa[X]muistiin[Bm]kirjo:muistiinkirjo Kirjoittaa_a ;
[Lt][Xp]muistiin=lukea[X]muistiin[Bm]lu:muistiinlu Hakea_a ;
!!!  [Lt][Xp]muistiin=merkitä[X]muistiin[Bm]merki:muistiinmerki Valita_ä ;
[Lt][Xp]muistiin=palauttaa[X]muistiin[Bm]palaut:muistiinpalaut Alittaa_a ;
!!! [Lt][Xp]muistiin=panna[X]muistiin[Bm]pan:muistiinpan Mennä_a ;
